Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-505
Container; filling by other than owner; unlawful.

The use of a container by any person other than the person whose name, mark, initial, or device is or has been upon such container, without written consent or purchase of such marked and distinguished container, for the sale of liquefied petroleum gas or filling or refilling with liquefied petroleum gas, or the possession of such container by any person other than the person having his or her name, mark, initial, or other device thereon, without the consent of such owner, is presumptive evidence of the unlawful use, filling or refilling, or trafficking in of such container.

Laws 1951, c. 188, § 5, p. 697;

Laws 2001, LB 137, § 5.